Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2623
Program; financial assistance; limitation.

Financial assistance under sections 38-2620 to 38-2623 shall be continued not to exceed four years until the enrolled student has received a degree in optometry. Contracts with schools and colleges shall set forth terms and provisions for continuation of such payments.

Laws 1974, LB 911, § 4;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,136.08;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 896.